Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 87.
[STATE LOTTERY ESTABLISHED] (CONST., ART. 19, § 14, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 14. The amendment to that section, effective December 4, 2008, is incorporated within that section. The amendment was proposed by an initiated measure and was adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 648,122 for and 383,467 against.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.